Rhode Island statutes. Title 46 Waters and Navigation
Chapter 22 Regulation of Boats
46-22-15.1.
Operation of boat by nonresident as appointment of attorney to receive process.

Operation of a motorboat on the waters of this state by a nonresident person, his or her servant, or agent shall be deemed equivalent to an appointment by the nonresident of the secretary of state and the secretary’s successor in office, to be his or her true and lawful attorney, upon whom may be served all lawful processes in any action or proceeding against the nonresident, growing out of any accident or collision in which the nonresident, his or her servant, or agent, may be involved while operating a motorboat on the waters of this state, and that operation shall be a signification of the nonresident’s agreement that any such process against him or her, which is served as provided herein, shall be of the same force and validity as if served on him or her personally.

History of Section.

P.L. 1961, ch. 54, § 1; P.L. 1965, ch. 134, § 1; P.L. 1970, ch. 317, § 1; P.L. 1985, ch. 370, § 1.

46-22-15.2.
Service on nonresident.

Service of process as described in §

46-22-15.1

, shall be made by leaving a copy of the process with a fee of five dollars ($5.00) in the office of the secretary of state in the hands of the secretary or someone acting in the secretary’s stead and such service shall be sufficient service upon the nonresident; provided, that notice of the service and a copy of the process shall be forthwith sent by the plaintiff or his or her attorney by certified mail to the defendant at the address given upon the defendant’s application for a number, and the sender’s post office receipt of sending and the plaintiff’s or the plaintiff’s attorney’s affidavit of compliance herewith are appended to the process and entered with the declaration, or that the notice and a copy of the process are served upon the defendant by leaving the same in the defendant’s hands and possession by a duly constituted public officer qualified to serve civil process in the state or jurisdiction where the defendant is found, and that officer’s return showing the service to have been made at least fifteen (15) days before the return day of the process is appended to the process and entered with declaration. The court in which the action is pending may order such continuances as may be necessary to afford the defendant reasonable opportunity to defend the action.

History of Section.

P.L. 1961, ch. 54, § 1; P.L. 1965, ch. 134, § 1; P.L. 1970, ch. 317, § 1; P.L. 1985, ch. 370, § 1; P.L. 1991, ch. 354, § 11.

46-22-15.3.
Process fees as costs — Record of process.

The fee of five dollars ($5.00), paid by the plaintiff to the administrator of the division of motor vehicles at the time of the service shall be taxed in the plaintiff’s costs if he or she prevails in the suit. The administrator of the division of motor vehicles shall keep a record of all such process, which shall show the day and hour of service, and all fees so paid shall be paid over to the general treasurer.

History of Section.

P.L. 1961, ch. 54, § 1; G.L. 1956, ch. 134, § 1.

46-22-16.
Boat manufacturers and dealers.

The director is authorized to promulgate regulations governing the issuance of fourteen (14) day temporary numbers to be used by qualified manufacturers or dealers in transporting or demonstrating motorboats. The director may set rules qualifying dealers and manufacturers.

History of Section.

P.L. 1959, ch. 187, § 1; P.L. 1965, ch. 134, § 5; P.L. 1985, ch. 370, § 1.

46-22-17.
Enforcement.

The department of environmental management, harbormasters, assistant harbormasters, police officers authorized to make arrests, and employees of the department of environmental management, authorized to make arrests under the provisions of §§

2-12-8

,

20-1-12

, and

20-1-15

, shall have the authority to enforce the provisions of this chapter and, in the exercise thereof, shall have the authority to stop and board any vessel subject to this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1959, ch. 187, § 1; P.L. 1965, ch. 134, § 7; P.L. 1983, ch. 107, § 5; 1984, ch. 171, § 1.

46-22-17.1.
Enforcement power of employees of the department of environmental management.

Employees of the department of environmental management, authorized to make arrests under the provisions of chapter 1 of title 20, shall, in connection with the enforcement of the provisions of this chapter, be deemed officers within the meaning of §

11-32-1

and shall have the power:

To enforce all laws, rules, and regulations relating to this chapter;

To execute all warrants and search warrants for the violation of laws, rules, and regulations relating to this chapter;

To serve subpoenas issued for the trial of all offenses hereunder;

To carry firearms or other weapons, concealed or otherwise, in the course of and in performance of their duties under this chapter; and

To arrest, without warrant and on view, any person found violating any law, rule, or regulation relating to this chapter; take that person before a court having jurisdiction for trial; detain that person in custody at the expense of the state until arraignment; and to make and execute complaints within any district to the justice or clerk of the court against any person for any of the offenses enumerated under this chapter, committed within that district.

Employees of the department of environmental management authorized to make arrests under the provisions of §

2-12-8

, shall, in connection with the enforcement of the provisions of this chapter and the rules and regulations made thereunder, have the power to arrest without a warrant any person found in the act of violating any provision of this chapter, and shall not be required to give surety for costs upon any complaint made by him or her.

History of Section.

P.L. 1965, ch. 134, § 8.

46-22-17.2.
Prosecution of violations.

The director of the department of environmental management and the director’s deputies and assistants may, by virtue of their respective offices, make complaints of any violations of this chapter, and they shall not be required, either jointly or individually, to give recognizance or to furnish surety for costs or be liable for costs on those complaints.

History of Section.

P.L. 1965, ch. 134, § 8.

46-22-17.3.
Refusal to stop on order or command.

It shall be a misdemeanor, punishable by a fine of not more than one hundred dollars ($100), for any person to refuse to move or stop on oral command or order of any employee of the department of environmental management in the exercise of the employee’s duties under this chapter. It shall likewise be a misdemeanor, punishable as aforesaid, for any person to refuse to move or stop on oral command of a harbormaster, assistant harbormaster, or police officer, operating from a patrol boat identified as such and exercising the duties lawfully assigned to him or her.

History of Section.

P.L. 1965, ch. 134, § 8; P.L. 1970, ch. 209, § 1.

46-22-18.
Funds.

All money collected under the provisions of this chapter shall be paid into a restricted receipt account of the department of environmental management to be made available and shall be allocated, distributed and used in amounts sufficient to fully fund:

Expenses of the department of environmental management, incurred in the administration and enforcement of this chapter;

Expenses of boating safety, boating safety services and programs, boating education, marine patrols, enforcement training programs, and promotion and publicity relating to boating and boating safety and equipment related to boating safety;

Grants for the purpose set forth in subdivision (2) above;

Maintenance and improvement of recreational, commercial and navigational facilities relating to boating safety; including, but not limited to, the installation, financing, improvement, and maintenance of aids to navigation, and support facilities; and

Expenses incurred in cooperation with the government of the United States in boating and boating safety matters.

To the extent otherwise authorized by the general laws, funding services to mariners.

History of Section.

P.L. 1959, ch. 187, § 1; P.L. 1965, ch. 134, § 10; P.L. 1985, ch. 370, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 65, art. 24, § 2; P.L. 1991, ch. 44, art. 16, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 133, art. 16, § 1; P.L. 1993, ch. 138, art. 17, § 1; P.L. 1995, ch. 370, art. 40, § 161; P.L. 1998, ch. 31, art. 20, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 340, § 56.

46-22-19.
Penalties.

In addition to any other penalties specified in this chapter:

Any person who violates any provision of §§

46-22-3

—

46-22-5

,

46-22-8

,

46-22-9.2

,

46-22-10

, and

46-22-13

, or who violates any rule or regulation made under the provisions of those sections shall be guilty of a civil violation and be subject to a fine not to exceed one hundred dollars ($100) for each violation. Jurisdiction over violations of this subsection shall be with the traffic tribunal. In accordance with chapter 42-17.10, any person charged with violating any rule or regulation made under the provisions of this subsection may elect to dispose of the charge without personally appearing before the traffic tribunal by mailing or delivering the form and summons to the traffic tribunal with a check or money order in the amount of one hundred dollars ($100).

Any person who violates any provision of §§

46-22-7

and

46-22-12

shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be subject to a fine not to exceed two hundred dollars ($200) for each violation.

Any person who violates any provision of §§

46-22-9

and

46-22-9

.1 shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be subject to a fine not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000), or imprisonment not to exceed one year, or both for each violation.

History of Section.

P.L. 1959, ch. 187, § 1; P.L. 1965, ch. 134, § 9; P.L. 1981, ch. 369, § 2; P.L. 1985, ch. 370, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 84, § 17; P.L. 1988, ch. 153, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 47, § 2; P.L. 1991, ch. 124, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 253, § 8; P.L. 2007, ch. 294, § 8.

46-22-20.
Severability.

The provisions of this chapter shall be severable and, if any of the provisions shall be held invalid, the decision of the court respecting that provision or provisions shall not affect the validity of any other provision which can be given effect without that invalid provision.

History of Section.

P.L. 1959, ch. 187, § 1.

46-22-21.
Reporting of accidents, casualty, vandalism, and thefts.

The operator or owner of a vessel on the waters of this state, involved, or whose vessel is involved, in an accident, casualty, vandalism, or theft in excess of two thousand dollars ($2,000), or other casualty which results in death or injury to a person, shall report the same, and immediately give notice of the incident to the department of environmental management or to a nearby office of local or state police. In the event the local or state police are notified, it shall be the duty of the officer receiving the notice to immediately give notice of the incident to the of department of environmental management. In the event the department of environmental management is notified, it shall be the duty of the employee of the department receiving the notice to give notice of the incident to the state and local police of the city or town wherein the incident occurred within twenty-four hours (24) hours in the following circumstances: thefts in excess of one hundred dollars ($100), or any accident which results in bodily injury or death to a person. In order to allow more complete investigations of theft, all motorboats manufactured after 1971, required to apply for numbering in §

46-22-3

, shall provide to the department of environmental management, at the time of their next annual application, the full hull identification number of the vessel. Homemade vessels may apply to the department for identification numbers. The director may promulgate regulations for the enforcement of this requirement.

History of Section.

P.L. 1968, ch. 267, § 2; P.L. 1985, ch. 370, § 1; P.L. 1991, ch. 124, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 38, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 55, § 1.

46-22-22.
Owner required to make written reports.

The owner of a vessel involved in an accident, casualty, vandalism, or theft in excess of five hundred dollars ($500), shall, within five (5) days after the incident, forward a written report of the incident to the department of environmental management, on forms provided by the department.

History of Section.

P.L. 1968, ch. 267, § 2; P.L. 1991, ch. 124, § 1.

46-22-23.
Maximum speed within the city of Warwick.

The Warwick park and waterfront development commission is hereby authorized to establish maximum speed limits for boats in the public harbors of the city of Warwick at five (5) miles per hour. Any speed limits duly established by the commission, pursuant hereto, shall have the force and effect of law, and a violation thereof shall be a misdemeanor.

History of Section.

P.L. 1970, ch. 209, § 2.

46-22-24.
Scuba divers, skin diving, or snorkeling — Warning flags.

Any person scuba diving, skin diving, or snorkeling in an area where power or motor boats are operated, shall place a warning flag on a buoy at a place of his or her submergence, the flag to be at least twelve by twelve inches (12" X 12") with a white stripe running from the diagonal corners which stripe shall be one quarter (1/4) as wide as the flag, or conspicuously flown upon a boat which he or she is then using in the area, in which case the flag shall be at least eighteen by eighteen inches (18" X 18") and with a white stripe running from one upper corner to a diagonal lower corner, which stripe shall be one quarter (1/4) as wide as the flag itself. The flag shall be in place only while diving operations are in progress and, during the hours between sunset and sunrise, this flag shall be illuminated by a light shining on the flag. Motorboats shall not be operated within fifty feet (50´) of any flag as above described. No person shall be in violation of this section if he or she travels within fifty feet (50´) of a scuba diver or snorkeler who is in fact obstructing navigation.

Any person violating the provisions of this section shall be deemed guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be subject to a fine of not more than fifty dollars ($50.00).

However, any person using the above scuba diving, snorkel diving, or skin diving flag with the intention of obstructing navigation shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and shall also be subject to a fine of not more than fifty dollars ($50.00).

History of Section.

P.L. 1973, ch. 112, § 1; P.L. 1974, ch. 233, § 1; P.L. 1978, ch. 186, § 2.

46-22-25.
Regulations.

The director is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations necessary for the enforcement or implementation of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 370, § 1.

46-22-26.
Severability.

If any provision of this chapter, or the application thereof to any person or circumstances, shall be held invalid, any invalidity shall not affect the provisions or application of this chapter which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of the chapter are declared to be severable.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 65, art. 24, § 8.